Arkansas statutes. Title 13 Libraries, Archives, and Cultural Resources
Chapter 2

Libraries

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1995, No. 64, § 1, as amended by Acts 1997, No. 250, § 252, provided:

“(a)A Commission on Library Laws is created and shall be composed of seventeen (17) members to be appointed by the Governor as follows:

“(1)Five (5) shall be library directors, one from each of the state's five (5) library development districts;

“(2)Four (4) shall be citizens who are interested in and knowledgeable about library services;

“(3)Two (2) shall be representatives of municipal government;

“(4)Two (2) shall be representatives of county government;

“(5)One (1) shall be the state librarian or designee;

“(6)One (1) shall be a trustee from a library or library system that serves more than fifty thousand (50,000) people;

“(7)One (1) shall be a trustee from a library or library system that serves less than fifty thousand (50,000) people;

“(8)One (1) shall be an attorney who is knowledgeable about municipal and county law.

“(b)The governor shall make the appointments and select the chairperson from the commission membership no later than January 1, 1996.

“(c)The Commission shall hold its first meeting during January, 1996 at a time and place designated by the chairperson. Subsequent meetings will be held at the call of the chairperson or upon the written request of five (5) members of the commission.

“(d)The Governor may remove any commission member for incapacity, incompetence, neglect of duty or malfeasance in office.

“(e)The Governor shall fill any vacancy from a list of at least two (2) qualified candidates submitted within fifteen (15) days of the vacancy by the commission. The Governor shall make the appointment within fifteen (15) days after the commission has submitted the candidates' names.

“(f)The members shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed for expenses in accordance with Arkansas Code 25-16-901 et seq.”

Acts 1995, No. 64, § 2, provided:

“(a)The Commission on Library Laws shall study existing laws of the state that affect the operation and development of public and regional libraries for the purpose of developing a Model Library Law. The Model Library Law shall define the relationship of the library to the municipality and county in which it is located and may also address any other aspect of law that the commission deems appropriate for the future development of effective library services in this state.

“(b)The Commission on Library Laws shall hold public hearings, may hire staff and consultants as monies are available, and may solicit, accept, retain and administer gifts, grants or donations of money, services or property.

“(c)The Commission shall report its findings and make its recommendations to the Governor and the Bureau of Legislative Research by January 1, 1997.”

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates. Acts 2001, No. 912, § 3: Mar. 19, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the establishment of internet use policies for our public schools and libraries is vital; and that until this act goes into effect, minors will not be afforded the protection which will result from this act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 74: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act includes technical corrects to Act 923 of 2003 which establishes the classification and compensation levels of state employees covered by the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act; that Act 923 of 2003 will become effective on July 1, 2003; and that to avoid confusion this act must also effective on July 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

13-2-101. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning libraries, archives, and cultural resources, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1347, §1. The section was derived from Acts 1987, No. 555, §§ 1, 2; 2005, No. 1994, § 80.

13-2-102. Multijurisdictional system agreements.

All county public libraries created under the authority of §13-2-401 et seq. and all city public libraries created under the authority of §13-2-501 et seq. which have entered into interlocal cooperation agreements or any other formal or informal or contractual arrangements to form a joint city-county library, a regional library or library system, or any other form of multiple-jurisdiction library system which are not in written format shall within one (1) year formalize and renew in writing all such agreements and contractual arrangements among the libraries.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 402, § 14.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted by Acts 1997, No. 402, § 14, this section began:

“On and after the effective date of this act,”. The effective date of Acts 1997, No. 402, was August 1, 1997.

13-2-103. Library computer use — Policy — Signed agreement form required.

The board of directors of each library operated as an entity of the state or any city, county, or other political subdivision of the state with one (1) or more public access computers shall develop, adopt, and implement a written policy that:

(1)

Establishes and maintains a system to prevent a minor from gaining computer access to materials harmful to minors as defined in §5-68-501;

(2)

Provides for:

(A)

Suspending the privilege of a minor to use the public access computers if the minor violates the policy; and

(B)

Revoking such a privilege for a repeat offender; and

(3)

Requires each user to sign a computer-use agreement form outlining proper and improper use of public access computers prior to the user's being allowed to access the computer equipment.

(b)

For purposes of this section, “public access computer” means a computer that is:

(1)

Located in a public school or public library;

(2)

Accessible by a minor; and

(3)

Connected to any computer communication system such as, but not limited to, what is commonly known as the Internet.

(c)

Copies of the standards and rules for the enforcement of this section shall be submitted to the Arkansas State Library.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 912, § 2; 2003, No. 1473, § 28.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted by Acts 2001, No. 912, subsection (a) contained the following language following “implement”:

“by August 1, 2001.”

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment, in (a), deleted “by August 1, 2001” following “implement”; in (a)(1), inserted “and maintains” following “establishes” and substituted “a minor” for “minors”; inserted the subdivision designations in (a)(2); in (a)(2)(B), deleted “provides for” preceding “revoking” and substituted “offender” for “offenders”; in (a)(3), substituted “each user” for “all users” and “his or her” for “their”; and added (c).

Cross References.

School computer use policy, §6-21-107.

13-2-104. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning library computer use policy, was repealed by Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 28. The section was derived from Acts 2001, No. 1533, §§ 1, 3. For current law, see §13-2-103.

Subchapter 2

— Arkansas State Library

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)

The General Assembly finds:

“(1)

State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)

While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)

Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)

It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Cross References.

Depositories, §25-18-301 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1979, No. 489, § 12: July 1, 1979.

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 128: July 1, 2016.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-2-201. State and local publications defined — Exemptions.

(a)

As used in this subchapter, the terms “state publication” and “local publication” shall include any document issued or printed by any state agency or local government which may be released for distribution, but these terms do not include:

(1)

The bound volumes of the printed acts of each of the sessions of the General Assembly;

(2)

The bound volumes of the Arkansas Supreme Court Reports;

(3)

Printed copies of the Arkansas Statutes of 1947 Annotated or pocket part supplements thereto;

(4)

Any other printed document which may be obtained from the office of the Secretary of State upon the payment of a charge or fee therefor;

(5)

Correspondence and intraoffice or interoffice or agency communications or documents which are not of vital interest to the public;

(6)(A)

Publications of state or local agencies intended or designed to be of limited distribution to meet the requirements of educational, cultural, scientific, professional, or similar use of a limited or restricted purpose and which are not designed for general distribution.

(B)

Similarly, other publications or printed documents which are prepared to meet the limited distribution requirements of a governmental grant or use which are not intended for general distribution shall also be deemed exempt from the provisions of this subchapter unless funds have been provided for printing of a quantity of such publications sufficient for distribution.

(b)

A depository copy of each document noted in subdivisions (a)(1), (2), (3), and (6) shall be made available to the Arkansas State Library.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 489, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-307.

13-2-202. Effect of subchapter.

(a)(1)

Nothing in this subchapter shall repeal, alter, or change the duties and responsibilities of the Secretary of State to maintain a library of official books, records, and documents under the provisions of §13-2-301 et seq. and other laws of this state which impose specific duties upon the Secretary of State.

(2)

The library maintained by the Secretary of State under the provisions of §13-2-301 et seq. shall be designated as the Library of the Secretary of State, and the Secretary of State shall be librarian thereof.

(b)

Nothing in this subchapter shall repeal, alter, or change the powers, duties, and responsibilities of the Arkansas State Archives as defined by law.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 489, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-307n; Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 97; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 97.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “State Archives” for “History Commission” in (b).

13-2-203. Arkansas State Library created.

(a)

There is created and established within the Department of Education a division to be known as the Arkansas State Library.

(b)

The library shall function within the Department of Education in the same manner as provided by agencies transferred pursuant to a cabinet-level transfer under §25-43-105 and which shall be adequately funded and properly housed in a designated building at the seat of state government.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 489, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-301; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 2231.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment, in (b), substituted “Department of Education” for “department” and “pursuant to a cabinet-level transfer under §25-43-105” for “to the principal Department of government by a type 1 transfer under the provisions of §25-2-104”.

13-2-204. State Librarian.

(a)

The Arkansas State Library shall be headed by the State Librarian, to be appointed by the State Library Board, in consultation with the Secretary of the Department of Education. The State Librarian shall serve for such time and for such terms as the board may prescribe.

(b)

The State Librarian shall be a person of good professional standing and reputation, holding at least a master's degree from a graduate school of library science accredited by the American Library Association, and shall have had experience in library administration in academic, public, school, or special libraries.

(c)

The State Librarian shall have charge of the work of the library and shall perform such other duties as the board may prescribe.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 489, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-301; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 2232.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment inserted “in consultation with the Secretary of the Department of Education” in (a).

13-2-205. State Library Board.

(a)

There is created the State Library Board.

(b)(1)

The board shall consist of seven (7) members, to be appointed by the Governor subject to confirmation by the Senate.

(2)

The members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor for reasons of their interest in libraries and in statewide library development.

(3)(A)

One (1) member of the board shall be appointed from each of the four (4) congressional districts of this state in existence at the time of appointment, and three (3) members shall be selected from the state at large.

(B)

However, no more than two (2) members of the board shall be appointed from any one (1) congressional district.

(4)(A)

All members appointed to the board shall serve terms of seven (7) years and until their successors are appointed and qualified.

(B)

No board member shall be appointed to serve for more than two (2) consecutive full terms.

(c)

Vacancies occurring on the board due to death, resignation, or other reason shall be filled by appointment of the Governor for the remainder of the unexpired portion of the term in the same manner as for the initial appointment.

(d)(1)

Members of the board shall receive per diem at the rate established by law for attending board meetings or for performing other services required of members in their official capacity as members of the board.

(2)

In addition, members shall be entitled to mileage at the rate provided by law for official travel of state employees for each mile in traveling from their place of residence to meetings of the board and returning or for attending to other authorized business of the board.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 489, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-301; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 73; 1997, No. 1152, § 1; 2017, No. 540, § 12.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to §1-2-207, this section is set out above as amended by Acts 1997, No. 1152. Acts 1997, No. 250 amended subsection (d) of this section to read as follows:

“(d)

Members of the board may receive expense reimbursement and stipends in accordance with §25-16-901 et seq.”

As enacted by Acts 1997, No. 1152, § 1, subdivision (b)(4)(B) began:

“Beginning January 1, 1998,”.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1979, No. 489, § 2, also provided, in part, that the Arkansas Library Commission was abolished and that no less than four members of the commission serving on July 1, 1979, should be appointed as initial members of the State Library Board.

The terms of the members of the State Library Board are arranged so that one term expires every year.

Acts 1979, No. 489, § 10, abolished the State Library Board created by Acts 1927, No. 244, § 5, as amended, and transferred its functions and duties to the State Library Board created by this section.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “at the time of appointment” for “on July 1, 1979” in (b)(3)(A); and substituted “consecutive full terms” for “consecutive terms, including partial terms” in (b)(4)(B).

13-2-206. Meetings of board.

(a)

The State Library Board shall meet at such place or places and shall keep such records as it may deem appropriate.

(b)

The board shall select annually a chair and any other officers as it deems necessary.

(c)

The board shall adopt policies and bylaws governing its meetings, the conduct of its business, and the business of the Arkansas State Library.

(d)

The State Librarian shall serve as secretary of the board, but without a vote thereon, and shall attend all of the board meetings and keep records thereof.

(e)

A majority of the board's members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and all business transacted by the board shall be by majority vote of its members.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 489, §§ 1, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 6-301, 6-302; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 2233.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “secretary” for “Executive Secretary” in (d).

13-2-207. Powers and duties generally.

Within the limitations of facilities and funds provided for the Arkansas State Library, the library shall:

(1)

Acquire books and other library materials by purchase, exchange, gift, grant, or donation and catalog and maintain those books and materials and make them available for reference and research use of the public and the public officials and employees of this state and its political subdivisions under such rules established by the State Library Board as may be reasonably necessary to govern the use and preservation thereof;

(2)

Establish and maintain a collection of books and library materials of and pertaining to Arkansas and its people, resources, and history and maintain the collection as a separate section within the library;

(3)

Operate and maintain a collection of multimedia materials to complement book collections and establish reasonable rules for their use and preservation;

(4)

Provide specialized services to the blind and individuals with physical disabilities under a cooperative plan with the National Library Service for the Blind and Physically Handicapped of the Library of Congress;

(5)

Assist communities, libraries, schools, colleges, universities, study and civic clubs and groups, charitable and penal institutions, state agencies and departments, county and municipal governments, and any other institutions, agencies, and individuals with books, information, library materials, and services as needed;

(6)

Direct the establishment and development of county and regional library systems and programs, devise and implement a certification plan for public librarians, and assist in the design and building of public library facilities;

(7)

Conduct courses of library instruction, hold library institutes in various parts of the state, and encourage the recruitment and training of library personnel in any suitable manner;

(8)

Cooperate with the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education and the Division of Higher Education in devising plans for the development of libraries, in aiding librarians in their administration, in certification policies, and in formulating rules for the use of libraries;

(9)

Receive gifts of library materials, money, and real and personal property, to be held in trust, subject to the terms of the donation for the purposes of this subchapter;

(10)

Be the official state library agency designated to administer state and federal programs of aid to libraries and to undertake such other activities and services as will further statewide development of libraries and library systems through interlibrary, interagency, and interstate cooperation in order to secure efficient and effective library service for all Arkansans;

(11)(A)

Cooperate with the various officers, departments, and agencies of state government in pooling and sharing library materials and programs so that duplication of services and facilities shall be minimized and so that maximum utilization may be made of the library services and resources of this state.

(B)

In furtherance of subdivision (11)(A) of this section, the library may enter into contracts or agreements with state officers, departments, and agencies for the provision of special library services where needed and, under the terms of the contract or agreement, may provide for the method of financing special costs incurred by the library in furnishing and maintaining such special library services; and

(12)

Perform all other functions and services that are common to the purposes and objectives of a state library.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 489, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-303; Acts 1997, No. 208, § 9; 2019, No. 315, §§ 977, 978; 2019, No. 910, § 2234.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1997, No. 208, § 1, as reenacted by Acts 2017, No. 255, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent and purpose. The General Assembly hereby acknowledges that many of the laws relating to individuals with disabilities are antiquated, functionally outmoded, derogatory, and ambiguous or are inconsistent with more recently enacted provisions of the law. Consequently, it is the intent of the General Assembly and the purpose of this act to clarify the relevant chapters of Titles 1, 6, 9, 13, 14, 16, 17, 20, 22, 23, and 27 of the Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1979, No. 489, § 7, provided that all powers and duties formerly vested in the Arkansas Library Commission, not specifically repealed by or inconsistent with the act, should be transferred to the State Library. It further provided for the transfer of all of the commission's property to the State Library to be used as the board should determine.

Acts 1979, No. 489, § 8, provided, in part, that all powers and duties formerly vested in the Secretary of State under Acts 1971, No. 163 (§§25-18-306 —25-18-308), should be transferred to the Arkansas State Library.

Acts 1979, No. 489, § 9, provided, in part, that all powers, functions, and duties of the Arkansas Library Commission with respect to the Interstate Library Compact, §13-2-601 et seq., and all contracts and agreements entered into by the commission under the compact, should be performed by the State Library and the State Library Board.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (3) and (8).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in (8), substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education” and “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education”.

Cross References.

Preservation of state publications, §13-3-108.

Records of public officials, preservation, §13-3-107.

13-2-208. Cooperation with other libraries.

(a)

The Arkansas State Library shall cooperate with the public and private libraries in the State of Arkansas and may enter into necessary agreements with libraries in other states and the Library of Congress for the sharing of library books, documents, facilities, or services under such terms and conditions as the State Library Board shall determine to be within the scope and services of the Arkansas State Library and in keeping with the state's library programs.

(b)(1)

The Arkansas State Library shall obtain reports from all libraries and each year report the condition, growth, development, and manner of development of those libraries and such other facts and statistics as may be of public interest.

(2)

The Arkansas State Library shall include a summary thereof in its biennial report, which shall be filed with the Governor and the presiding officer of each house of the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 489, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-305.

13-2-209. Agreements with Arkansas State Archives and Secretary of State.

(a)

The Arkansas State Library, acting through the State Library Board, is authorized to enter into necessary agreements with the Arkansas State Archives, with respect to an overall plan and design to assure that the functions and materials of the library and the Arkansas State Archives may be convenient to the public and public officials of this state and to its political subdivisions, and to assure that unnecessary duplication of services and facilities is minimized.

(b)(1)(A)

In addition, the library is authorized to enter into contracts and agreements with the Secretary of State for the custody, storage, cataloging, or display in the library or Arkansas State Archives of any books, records, documents, or other papers in the custody of the Secretary of State.

(B)

This shall be done under such terms and conditions as may be mutually agreed to by the parties.

(2)

The library is also authorized to accept custody and control over any books, records, and documents which the Secretary of State is now required by law to keep or maintain in his or her official files or volumes, if:

(A)

The Secretary of State shall determine that the records could be properly cataloged, stored, and preserved in the library or Arkansas State Archives; and

(B)

The Governor agrees in writing for the transfer of the books, records, and documents from the Secretary of State to the library or Arkansas State Archives, in accordance with the terms of the agreement made in writing signed by the Secretary of State and the State Librarian or the State Historian for the custody, cataloging, preservation, and care of the records.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 489, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-304; Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 98; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 98.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “State Archives” for “History Commission” in the section heading and in (a); substituted “Arkansas State Archives” for “commission” in (a); and inserted “Arkansas” preceding “State Archives” in (b)(1)(A), (b)(2)(A), and (b)(2)(B).

13-2-210. Depository for federal, state, and local documents.

The Arkansas State Library shall serve as the state's regional depository library for federal documents and shall become the official depository for state and local documents.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 489, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-307.

13-2-211. Depository agreements and eligibility.

(a)

The Arkansas State Library may enter into depository agreements with any city, county, district, regional, town, school, college, or university library in this state.

(b)

The Arkansas State Library shall establish standards for eligibility as a depository library under this section, §13-2-210, and §§13-2-212 —13-2-214. The standards may include and take into account:

(1)

The type of library;

(2)

The library's ability to preserve state and local publications and to make them available for public use; and

(3)

The library's geographical location, in order to assure that the publications are conveniently accessible to residents in all areas of the state.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 489, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-307.

13-2-212. State and Local Government Publications Clearinghouse.

(a)

The Arkansas State Library shall create and maintain a State and Local Government Publications Clearinghouse.

(b)

The Arkansas State Library shall make such rules as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of the clearinghouse.

(c)(1)

All state agencies, including the General Assembly and its committees, constitutional officers, any department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency of the State of Arkansas, all local governments, including cities of the first and second class and incorporated towns, and counties, and all boards, commissions, or agencies thereof shall furnish to the Arkansas State Library, upon release, a specified number of copies of each of its state or local publications.

(2)

These publications shall be furnished to enable the clearinghouse to meet the needs of the Depository Library System and to provide library loan services to those libraries without depository status.

(3)

The distribution will be required only if sufficient funds are appropriated for the printing of these materials by the agencies, boards, and commissions and for the distribution thereof by the Arkansas State Library to depository libraries.

(d)

At least quarterly, and more frequently if funds are available, the clearinghouse of the Arkansas State Library shall publish and, upon request, distribute a list of state publications to all state agencies and contracting depository libraries.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 489, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-307.

13-2-213. Number of copies provided clearinghouse.

(a)

If sufficient funds are available, each state and local agency printing or duplicating publications of the type which are to be made available to the State and Local Government Publications Clearinghouse shall print or duplicate fifty (50) additional copies or a lesser number as may be requested by the Arkansas State Library, for deposit with the clearinghouse for distribution to established depository libraries or interstate library exchange.

(b)

However, if a state agency or a local governmental agency does not have sufficient funds or resources available to furnish the fifty (50) copies to the clearinghouse, it shall notify the Arkansas State Library and deliver to the clearinghouse three (3) copies of each publication to be maintained in the Arkansas State Library, to be indexed and made available on loan to participating libraries through the interlibrary loan services of the Arkansas State Library.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 489, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-307.

13-2-214. Libraries of colleges and universities — Contracts — Status.

(a)

The Arkansas State Library is authorized to enter into contracts or agreements with the Mullins Library of the University of Arkansas at Fayetteville and the library of each of the state-supported institutions of higher learning in this state to provide through the State and Local Government Publications Clearinghouse any of the clearinghouse, exchange, depository, or selective or partial depository duties or functions of any of the libraries, or to provide depository library services in behalf of any of the libraries that may be mutually agreed to by the Arkansas State Library and the Mullins Library of the University of Arkansas at Fayetteville or one (1) of the several institutions of higher learning of this state.

(b)(1)

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to repeal, amend, modify, or affect the status of the Mullins Library of the University of Arkansas at Fayetteville as a depository of state, city, and county documents under the provisions of §§25-18-301 —25-18-304.

(2)

This subchapter shall not repeal, amend, modify, or affect the powers of the Mullins Library of the University of Arkansas at Fayetteville or the library of each of the state-supported institutions of higher learning to be a selective or partial depository of state, city, and county documents under the provisions of §§25-18-306 —25-18-308.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 489, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-307.

Publisher's Notes.

Sections 25-18-302 — 25-18-304, referred to in subsection (b), were repealed by Acts 1993, No. 1224, § 6.

Subchapter 3

— Library of the Secretary of State

13-2-301. Librarian.

The Secretary of State shall be librarian for the Library of the Secretary of State and shall have custody and direction of all books, papers, maps, charts, and all other things belonging to it, and he or she shall take special care that none of them be lost or injured.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 144, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 4428; Pope's Dig., § 5463; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-301.

Publisher's Notes.

Section13-2-202 provides that nothing in §13-2-201 et seq., which created the State Library Board, shall affect the duties of the Secretary of State under this subchapter and that the library maintained by the Secretary of State shall be known as the Library of the Secretary of State.

13-2-302. Binding of books and documents.

The Secretary of State shall cause to be bound, if not already done, in an inexpensive and substantial manner, three (3) copies of each of the acts of the General Assembly.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 144, § 2; C. & M. Dig., § 4429; Pope's Dig., § 5464; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-302; Acts 2001, No. 791, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment substituted “acts of the General Assembly of this state” for “following works”; and deleted (1) through (4).

13-2-303. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning books arranged in a convenient room, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 791, § 2. The section was derived from Rev. Stat., ch. 144, § 3; C. & M. Dig., § 4430; Pope's Dig., § 5465; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-303.

13-2-304. Procuring copies of missing books.

Where there shall be a deficiency in any of the acts, journals, or other works, it shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to correspond with the proper officer for the purpose of procuring copies of the different works, and, if not otherwise procured, he or she shall purchase them and place them in the Library of the Secretary of State.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 144, § 4; C. & M. Dig., § 4431; Pope's Dig., § 5466; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-304.

13-2-305. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the purchase of books as directed by the General Assembly, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 791, § 3. The section was derived from Rev. Stat., ch. 144, § 5; C. & M. Dig., § 4432; Pope's Dig., § 5467; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-305.

13-2-306. Expenses of procuring works.

All expenses of procuring copies of acts, journals, and other works as are mentioned in this subchapter shall be paid out of the contingent fund of the General Assembly.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 144, § 6; C. & M. Dig., § 4433; Pope's Dig., § 5468; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-306.

13-2-307. Accounts.

The Auditor of State shall adjust the accounts of the Secretary of State as Librarian for the Library of the Secretary of State and draw warrants for the payment of them.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 144, § 7; C. & M. Dig., § 4434; Pope's Dig., § 5469; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-307.

13-2-308. Privilege of using books.

The officers of the several departments of the state, who are entitled to the use of the Library of the Secretary of State, may introduce citizens or strangers into the library, who shall have the privilege, during all seasonable hours, to read any of the books therein.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 144, § 11; C. & M. Dig., § 4438; Pope's Dig., § 5473; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-311.

13-2-309. Removal of books.

(a)

No person shall be permitted to remove any book from the Library of the Secretary of State except the Governor, Auditor of State, Treasurer of State, members of the General Assembly, Justices of the Supreme Court and judges of circuit courts, and attorneys for the state.

(b)

No person shall be permitted to remove any book from the library without giving a receipt therefor to the Secretary of State.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 144, §§ 8, 9; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4435, 4436; Pope's Dig., §§ 5470, 5471; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-308, 5-309.

13-2-310. Injury to or failure to return books or charts — Penalty.

If any person shall injure or fail to return any book, map, or chart taken from the Library of the Secretary of State for more than three (3) months, he or she shall forfeit and pay to the Secretary of State, for the use and benefit of the library, three (3) times the value thereof, or of the set to which it belongs, to be recovered in the name of the state for the use of the library.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 144, § 10; C. & M. Dig., § 4437; Pope's Dig., § 5472; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-310.

Subchapter 4

— County Libraries

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§13-2-401 —13-2-408 may not apply to §13-2-409, which was enacted subsequently.

Cross References.

Local government reserve funds, §14-73-101 et seq.

Public bodies corporate and politic, §25-20-201 et seq.

Supreme Court Reports,
§25-18-218.

13-2-401. Establishment.

(a)

The county quorum courts of the several counties shall have the power and authority to establish, maintain, and operate county public libraries or public library services or systems in the manner and with the functions prescribed in this subchapter, and counties may appropriate money for these purposes.

(b)

The county quorum court shall also have the power to establish in cooperation with another county or other counties a joint public library or a joint library service or system for the benefit of the cooperating counties.

(c)(1)

Establishment of county libraries or library systems shall be evidenced by an ordinance of the county quorum court or by an agreement between the governing bodies of the several counties participating in a regional library system or coordinating library services under an interlocal agreement.

(2)

Appropriations for the establishment and maintenance of a county library or library system shall be in the manner prescribed by law for expenditures by counties.

(d)

In addition to county library boards created under this section, §13-2-402, and §13-2-404, a county quorum court may by ordinance establish a county library board to conduct the affairs of the county public library or its library services or system in accordance with the law for establishing other county advisory or administrative boards found at §14-14-705.

History.

Acts 1927, No. 244, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 2629; A.S.A. 1947, § 17-1001; Acts 1997, No. 402, § 1; 2011, No. 837, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted by Acts 1997, No. 402, § 1, subdivision (d)(2) began:

“Beginning January 1, 1998,”.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment deleted (d)(2).